District of Columbia statutes.
3-2803

Repealed

Compensation and expenses of the Task Force members.

Repealed.

Mar. 6, 1991, D.C. Law 8-201, § 4, 37 DCR 7476
Apr. 29, 1998, D.C. Law 12-86, § 401(d), 45 DCR 1172
1981 Ed., § 2-3703.